Maryland, session 2025, HB0829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (I) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS
INFRASTRUCTURE, HARDWARE, OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY,
EFFICIENCY, RELIABILITY, OR RESILIENCE OF A NEW OR EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINE FACILITY.
(II) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” INCLUDES:
1. GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
2. HIGH–PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; AND
3. STORAGE USED AS TRANSMISSION.
(3) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the
Environment; or
(iii) mined land.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.

HOUSE BILL 829 3
[(4)] (5) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated
cumulatively for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more
than 2 megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from

HOUSE BILL 829
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (6) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area
in which surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (7) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission
line [that is] designed to carry, OR AN ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY THAT
SUPPORTS THE CARRYING OF, a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would allow an
out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of the electric
system in Maryland that is owned by an electric company.
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or
2. a qualified generator lead line.
(ii) If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle, the Commission shall exempt a person from the requirement to
obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section.

HOUSE BILL 829 5
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a person
may not apply to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction of
a qualified generator lead line unless:
1. at least 90 days before the filing of an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the person had in good faith offered the
electric company that owns that portion of the electric grid in Maryland to which the
qualified generator lead line would interconnect a full and fair opportunity for the electric
company to construct the qualified generator lead line; and
2. at any time at least 10 days before the filing of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the electric company:
A. did not accept from the person a proposal or a negotiated
version of the proposal under which the electric company would construct the qualified
generator lead line; or
B. stated in writing that the electric company did not intend
to construct the qualified generator lead line.
(2) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, and the Commission has found that the
capacity is necessary to ensure a sufficient supply of electricity to customers in the State, a
person may not exercise a right of condemnation in connection with the construction of a
generating station.
(3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of an overhead transmission line that is
designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) For construction related to an existing overhead transmission
line, the Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for
good cause.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subject
to subparagraph [(iv)] (V) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line only
if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the overhead
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.

HOUSE BILL 829
(iv) AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS APPLICATION:
1. AN ANALYSIS OF ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED
TRANSMISSION LINE, INCLUDING EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSIDERED, AS
PART OF THE APPLICANT’S INTERNAL PLANNING PROCESS, ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES, AND ANY
TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES REQUIRED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION,
LLC, INCLUDING:
A. THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED TRANSMISSION LINE;
B. AN ANALYSIS OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES AND WHETHER THE USE OF THE TECHNOLOGIES COULD DELAY OR
PREVENT THE NEED FOR FUTURE TRANSMISSION OR GENERATION UPGRADES;
B. C. ALTERNATIVE ROUTINGS;
C. D. TECHNOLOGIES OR MODIFICATIONS TO ONE OR MORE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS IN THE STATE THAT COULD AVOID THE NEED
FOR THE TRANSMISSION LINE;
D. E. THE COSTS TO RATEPAYERS;
E. F. RESOURCE ADEQUACY;
F. G. ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND DEMAND RESPONSE;
G. H. THE IMPACT OF THE PROJECT ON THE ENVIRONMENT;
H. I. A REVIEW OF AN INTEGRATED ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION–DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM TO ADDRESS THE NEED FOR THE
TRANSMISSION LINE; AND
I. J. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE; AND
2. AN ANALYSIS OF THE TRANSMISSION LINE ROUTE
SELECTION, INCLUDING;
A. RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COST ESTIMATES;

HOUSE BILL 829 7
B. COST CONTAINMENT EFFORTS;
C. CONSTRUCTION SCHEDULE;
D. ACQUISITION OF LAND AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY;
E. OUTAGE COORDINATION; AND
F. THE APPLICANT’S EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH
COMMUNITIES AND STAKEHOLDERS ON ROUTE CONSIDERATION; AND
3. AN ANALYSIS OF THE USE OF ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES AND WHETHER THE USE WILL DELAY OR AVOID
FUTURE TRANSMISSION OR GENERATION UPGRADES.
(V) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public convenience
and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line in the electric
distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an electric
company if:
1. the overhead transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the overhead transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VI) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of an
overhead transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line, a person may acquire by
condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage
in excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate
of public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not:
1. require the person to obtain new real property or
additional rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2. require larger or higher structures to accommodate:

HOUSE BILL 829
A. increased voltage; or
B. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction.
2. Within 30 days after construction is completed under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, a person shall file a report with the Commission
describing the work that was completed.
(f) For the construction of an overhead transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
[and]
(II) ANY ALTERNATIVES CONSIDERED BY PJM
INTERCONNECTION, LLC;
(III) THE ANALYSIS OF EVIDENCE THAT ALTERNATIVES
CONDUCTED HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED BY THE APPLICANT UNDER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (B)(3)(IV) OF THIS SECTION;
(IV) ANY ALTERNATIVES SUBMITTED BY OTHER PARTIES TO THE
TRANSMISSION PROCEEDINGS; AND
[(ii)] (V) (III) for construction related to a new overhead
transmission line, the alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the
estimated capital and operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the
reason why the alternative route was rejected;
(2) require as an ongoing condition of the certificate of public convenience
and necessity that an applicant comply with:
(i) all relevant agreements with PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., or its
successors, related to the ongoing operation and maintenance of the overhead transmission
line; and
(ii) all obligations imposed by the North America Electric Reliability
Council and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission related to the ongoing operation
and maintenance of the overhead transmission line; and

HOUSE BILL 829 9
(3) require the applicant to identify whether the overhead transmission
line is proposed to be constructed on:
(i) an existing brownfields site;
(ii) property that is subject to an existing easement; or
(iii) a site where a tower structure or components of a tower structure
used to support an overhead transmission line exist.
7–207.4.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) ON SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025 2026, AND EVERY 2 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH
OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION A REPORT THAT:
(1) (I) IDENTIFIES AREAS OF TRANSMISSION CONGESTION FOR
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS AND ANY REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
TRANSMISSION CONGESTION ISSUES FOR THE 5 YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING
THE DATE OF THE REPORT;
(2) (II) IDENTIFIES THE PROJECTED OR ACTUAL COST TO
RATEPAYERS AS A RESULT OF PAST AND PROJECTED FUTURE TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION;
(3) (III) IDENTIFIES THE FEASIBILITY AND COST OF USING
ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF ADDRESSING TRANSMISSION CONGESTION, INCLUDING
THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(4) (IV) IDENTIFIES THE ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND SOCIAL
ISSUES POSED BY THE USE OF EACH ALTERNATIVE MEANS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM
(3) (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION PARAGRAPH; AND
(5) (V) IF FEASIBLE, PROPOSES AN ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO ADDRESS AREAS OF TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) (I) OF THIS SUBSECTION PARAGRAPH.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY MODIFY THE REPORTING SCHEDULE
SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 829
(C) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE MAY
USE ANY AVAILABLE DATA FROM PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC, OR OTHER
SOURCES IN COMPLETING THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) IF THE COMMISSION AUTHORIZES THE USE OF ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES AS A RESULT OF INFORMATION RECEIVED IN A
REPORT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE REASONABLE
COST RECOVERY FOR THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION
LINE USES ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES AS A RESULT OF
INFORMATION REPORTED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER
REASONABLE METHODS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL INCENTIVES FOR THE USE OF
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.